Illinois, session 104th, SB3314.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 9.47 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/9.47 new)7    Sec. 9.47. Faculty credit hour report. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Nontenure-line" means faculty who are not eligible to be 10tenured or on the tenure track.11    "Tenure-line" means faculty who are either tenured or on 12the tenure track.13    (b) By September 1, 2028 and every September 1 thereafter, 14the Board shall compile and make available to the public a 15report that contains the following information for all public 16institutions of higher education, except for community 17colleges:18        (1) the number of credit hours taught by full-time 19    instructional faculty, organized by institution, tenure 20    status, including tenure-line and nontenure-line, and 21    discipline; and22        (2) the number of credit hours taught by part-time 23    instructional faculty, organized by institution and   SB3314 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17510 LNS 30937 b1    discipline. 2    Section 10. The Public Community College Act is amended by 3adding Section 2-28 as follows: 4    (110 ILCS 805/2-28 new)5    Sec. 2-28. Faculty credit hour report. 6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Nontenure-line" means faculty who are not eligible to be 8tenured or on the tenure track.9    "Tenure-line" means faculty who are either tenured or on 10the tenure track.11    (b) By September 1, 2028 and every September 1 thereafter, 12the State Board shall compile and make available to the public 13a report that contains the following information for all 14community colleges:15        (1) the number of credit hours taught by full-time 16    instructional faculty, organized by institution, tenure 17    status, including tenure-line and nontenure-line, and 18    discipline; and19        (2) the number of credit hours taught by part-time 20    instructional faculty, organized by institution and 21    discipline.